Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB350.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Commercial purpose." As follows: 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (1) The use of a record for any of the following purposes:(i) Selling or reselling any portion of the record.(ii) Obtaining names and addresses from the record for the purpose of commercial solicitation.(iii) Any other purpose through which the requester can reasonably expect to generate revenue.(2) The term does not include the use of a record by a nonprofit educational or noncommercial scientific institution for scholarly or scientific research or the use of a record by the news media, a journalist or an author for news gathering or dissemination in a newspaper, periodical, book, digital publication or radio or television news broadcast.* * *Section 2. Section 703 of the act is amended to read:Section 703. Written requests.(a) Submission and information.--A written request for access to records may be submitted in person, by mail, by e-mail, by facsimile or, to the extent provided by agency rules, by any other electronic means. A written request must be addressed to the open-records officer designated pursuant to section 502. Employees of an agency shall be directed to forward requests for records to the open-records officer. A written request should identify or describe the records sought with sufficient specificity to enable the agency to ascertain which records are being requested and shall include the name and address to which the agency should address its response. [A](b) Reason for request.--Except as provided in subsection (c), a written request need not include any explanation of the requester's reason for requesting or intended use of the records 20250SB0350PN0295 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unless otherwise required by law.(c) Requests for commercial purpose.--An agency may require a requester to certify in writing whether the request is for a commercial purpose. Certification shall be submitted in a manner approved by the Office of Open Records. A requester that submits a false written statement under this subsection shall be subject to 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).Section 3. Section 1307 of the act is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1307. Fee limitations.* * *(e.1) Records to be used for commercial purpose.--(1) In responding to a request for records that will be used for a commercial purpose, an agency may charge a requester additional standard fees for the search, retrieval, review, redaction and duplication of the records. The fees shall be calculated at no more than the hourly wage of the lowest-paid public employee of the agency who is capable of searching, retrieving, reviewing, redacting or duplicating the information necessary to comply with the request.(2) Prior to granting a request for information to be used for a commercial purpose , the agency, upon request, shall provide the requester with an estimate of the fees charged under paragraph (1), including estimated cost of personnel hours.(3) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to any of the following:(i) A request for records that are subject to the fees under subsection (b)(4).20250SB0350PN0295 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) A request for records that are subject to fees established in laws or regulations of this Commonwealth that are not subject to this act.(iii) A request for records from an attorney on behalf of a client if records are not obtained for the purpose of selling, reselling or solicitation by the attorney or the client or used by the client for a commercial purpose.(iv) A request for records from an entity holding a certificate of authority or license from the Insurance Department, or a contractor, vendor, licensee, service provider or affiliate of the entity, provided that the records obtained shall only be used for the business of insurance.* * *(i) Alternative fee arrangement or service arrangement .--An agency and a requester may enter into a contract, memorandum of understanding or other agreement that provides an alternative fee arrangement or service arrangement to the fees authorized under this section. An agreement under this subsection shall be public.(j) Appeals.--A fee charged under this section may be appealed to the Office of Open Records.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0350PN0295 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324